Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Sections 2 and 3 of this 2021 Act are added to and made a  part of the In-
surance Code.
SECTION 2. (1) An insurer offering a short term health insurance policy in this state
shall include in any policy  document, application materials or advertisements related to the
policy a notice informing an insured or prospective insured under the policy that:
(a) The policy  is not subject to certain federal requirements for health insurance, in-
cluding requirements in  the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (P.L. 111-148) as
amended by the Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act (P.L. 111-152);
(b) The insured or prospective insured should  carefully review the policy documents; and
(c) If the policy expires or an  insured loses coverage under the policy, the insured may
have to wait  until the next annual open enrollment period to enroll in another policy of
health insurance.
(2) The Department of Consumer and Business Services  may adopt rules to implement
this section, including rules prescribing the form or manner of the notice described in  sub-
section (1) of this section or any additional information that must be included in the notice.
SECTION 3. An insurer offering an individual health benefit plan  may establish a due
date for payment of  the first premium for the plan no earlier than 15 days after the date that
the coverage begins or 15 days after the insurer sends  the initial invoice to the insured,
whichever is later.
SECTION 4.  ORS 442.373 is amended to read:
442.373. (1) The Oregon Health Authority shall establish and maintain  a program that requires
reporting entities to report health care data for the following purposes:
(a) Determining the maximum capacity and distribution of existing resources allocated to health
care.
(b) Identifying the demands for health care.
(c) Allowing health care policymakers to make informed choices.
(d) Evaluating the effectiveness of intervention programs in improving health outcomes.
(e) Comparing the costs and effectiveness of various treatment settings and approaches.
(f) Providing information to consumers and purchasers of health care.
(g) Improving the quality and affordability of health care and health care coverage.
Enrolled House Bill 2046 (HB 2046-A) Page 1
(h) Assisting the authority  in furthering the health policies expressed by the Legislative As-
sembly in ORS 442.310.
(i) Evaluating health disparities, including but not  limited to disparities related to race and
ethnicity.
(2) The authority shall prescribe by rule standards  that are consistent with standards adopted
by the Accredited Standards Committee X12 of the American National Standards Institute,  the
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services and the National Council for  Prescription Drug Pro-
grams that:
(a) Establish the time, place,  form and manner of reporting data under this section, including
but not limited to:
(A) Requiring the use of unique patient and provider identifiers;
(B) Specifying a uniform coding  system that reflects all health care utilization and costs for
health care services provided to Oregon residents in other states; and
(C) Establishing enrollment thresholds below which reporting will not be required.
(b) Establish the types of data to be reported under this section, including but not limited to:
(A) Health care claims and  enrollment data used by reporting entities and paid health care
claims data;
(B) Reports, schedules, statistics or other data relating to  health care costs, prices, quality,
utilization or resources  determined by the authority to be necessary to carry out the purposes of
this section; and
(C) Data related to race, ethnicity and primary language collected in  a manner consistent with
established national standards.
(3) Any third party administrator that is not required to obtain a  license under ORS 744.702 and
that is  legally responsible for payment of a claim for a health care item or service provided to an
Oregon resident may report to the authority the health  care data described in subsection (2) of this
section.
(4) The authority shall adopt rules establishing requirements for reporting entities to train pro-
viders on protocols  for collecting race, ethnicity and primary language data in a culturally compe-
tent manner.
(5)(a) The authority shall  use data collected under this section to provide information to con-
sumers of health care to empower the consumers to make economically sound and medically  appro-
priate decisions. The information must  include, but not be limited to, the prices and quality of health
care services.
(b) The authority shall, using only data collected under this section from  reporting entities de-
scribed in ORS 442.372 (1) to (3), post to its website health  care price information including the
median prices paid  by the reporting entities to hospitals and hospital outpatient clinics for, at a
minimum, the 50 most  common inpatient procedures and the 100 most common outpatient proce-
dures.
(c) The health care price information posted to the website must be:
(A) Displayed in a consumer friendly format;
(B) Easily accessible by consumers; and
(C) Updated at least annually to reflect the most recent data available.
(d) The authority shall apply for and receive donations, gifts and grants from any public or
private source to pay the cost of posting health care price information  to its website in accordance
with this subsection. Moneys received shall be deposited to the Oregon Health Authority Fund.
(e) The obligation of the authority to post health  care price information to its website as re-
quired by this subsection is limited to the extent of any moneys specifically appropriated  for that
purpose or available from donations, gifts and grants from private or public sources.
(6) The authority may contract with a  third party to collect and process the health care data
reported under this section. The contract must  prohibit the collection of Social Security numbers
and must prohibit the disclosure or use of the  data for any purpose other than those specifically
Enrolled House Bill 2046 (HB 2046-A) Page 2
authorized by the contract. The contract must require the third party to transmit all  data collected
and processed under the contract to the authority.
(7) The  authority shall facilitate a collaboration between the Department of Human Services, the
authority, the Department of Consumer and Business Services  and interested stakeholders to de-
velop a comprehensive health care information system  using the data reported under this section
and collected by the authority under ORS 442.370 and 442.400 to 442.463. The  authority, in consul-
tation with interested stakeholders, shall:
(a) Formulate the data sets that will be included in the system;
(b) Establish the criteria and procedures for the development of limited use data sets;
(c) Establish the criteria and procedures to ensure  that limited use data sets are accessible and
compliant with federal and state privacy laws; and
(d) Establish a time frame for the creation of the comprehensive  health care information system.
(8) Information disclosed through the comprehensive health care information system  described
in subsection (7) of this section:
(a) Shall be available, when  disclosed in a form and manner that ensures the privacy and secu-
rity of personal health information as required by state and federal laws, as a resource  to insurers,
employers, providers, purchasers of  health care and state agencies to allow for continuous review
of health care utilization, expenditures and performance in this state;
(b) Shall be available to Oregon programs  for quality in health care for use in improving health
care in Oregon,  subject to rules prescribed by the authority conforming to state and federal privacy
laws or limiting access to limited use data sets;
(c) Shall be  presented to allow for comparisons of geographic, demographic and economic factors
and institutional size; and
(d) May not disclose trade secrets of reporting entities.
(9) The collection, storage and release of health care data and other information under this
section is subject to the requirements  of the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability
Act.
(10)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (9) of this section,  in addition to the comprehensive
health care information system described in subsection (7) of this section, the Department
of Consumer and Business Services shall  be allowed to access, use and disclose data collected
under this section  by certifying in writing that the data will be used only to carry out the
department’s duties.
(b) Personally identifiable information disclosed  to the department under paragraph (a)
of this  subsection, including a consumer’s name, address, telephone number or electronic
mail address, is  confidential and not subject to further disclosure under ORS 192.311 to
192.478.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 743.417 is amended to read:
743.417. (1) [An individual health insurance policy ] A policy of health insurance issued to an
individual residing in this state  shall  specify a minimum grace period [ of at least 10 days after ]
following the premium due  date for the payment of each premium falling due after the first pre-
mium, during which grace period the policy shall  continue in force.  Unless a longer grace period
is provided by federal law, the grace period must be at least:
(a) Ten days for a policy other than an individual health benefit plan; and
(b) Thirty days for an individual health benefit plan.
(2) A policy that contains  a cancellation provision may add [ the following clause ] at the end of
the provision described in subsection (1) of this section  the following clause or an equivalent
clause approved by the Department of Consumer  and Business Services : “subject to the right
of the insurer to cancel in accordance with the cancellation provision hereof.”
(3) A policy in which the insurer reserves the right to refuse renewal shall have  the following
clause , or an equivalent clause approved by the  department,  at the beginning of the provision
described in subsection (1) of this section: “Unless not less than 30 days prior to  the premium due
date the insurer has delivered to the insured or  has mailed to the last address of the insured as
Enrolled House Bill 2046 (HB 2046-A) Page 3
shown by the records of the insurer  written notice of its intention not to renew this policy beyond
the period for  which the premium has been accepted. The insurer shall state in the notice the reason
for its refusal to renew this policy.”
(4) Subsections (2) and (3)  of this section may not be construed to permit the cancellation
of or refusal to renew a policy if the  cancellation or refusal to renew is otherwise prohibited
by the Insurance Code  or rules adopted by the department to carry out the provisions of the
Insurance Code.
SECTION 6.  ORS 743B.005 is amended to read:
743B.005. For purposes of ORS 743.004,  743.007, 743.022, 743.417, 743.535, 743B.003 to 743B.127 ,
[and] 743B.128, 743B.250, 743B.323 and sections 2 and 3 of this 2021 Act :
(1) “Actuarial certification” means a written statement by a member of the  American Academy
of Actuaries or  other individual acceptable to the Director of the Department of Consumer and
Business Services that a carrier is in compliance with the provisions  of ORS 743B.012 based upon
the person’s examination, including a review of the appropriate records and of the actuarial as-
sumptions and methods used by the carrier in establishing premium rates  for small employer health
benefit plans.
(2) “Affiliate” of, or person “affiliated” with, a specified  person means any carrier who, directly
or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, controls or is controlled by or  is under common
control with a specified person. For  purposes of this definition, “control” has the meaning given that
term in ORS 732.548.
(3) “Affiliation period”  means, under the terms of a group health benefit plan issued by a health
care service contractor, a period:
(a) That is applied uniformly and without regard to any  health status related factors to an
enrollee or late enrollee;
(b) That must expire before any coverage becomes effective under the plan for  the enrollee or
late enrollee;
(c) During which no premium shall be charged to the enrollee or late enrollee; and
(d) That begins on the enrollee’s or late enrollee’s first date  of eligibility for coverage and runs
concurrently with any eligibility waiting period under the plan.
(4) “Bona fide association” means an association that:
(a) Has been in active existence for at least five years;
(b) Has been formed and maintained in good faith for purposes other than obtaining insurance;
(c) Does not  condition membership in the association on any factor relating to the health status
of an individual or the individual’s dependent or employee;
(d) Makes health  insurance coverage that is offered through the association available to all
members of the association regardless  of the health status of the member or individuals who are
eligible for coverage through the member;
(e) Does not make health insurance coverage that is offered  through the association available
other than in connection with a member of the association;
(f) Has a constitution and bylaws; and
(g) Is not owned or controlled by a carrier, producer or affiliate of a carrier or producer.
(5) “Carrier” means any person who provides health benefit plans in this state, including:
(a) A licensed insurance company;
(b) A health care service contractor;
(c) A health maintenance organization;
(d) An association or group of employers that provides benefits by means of a multiple  employer
welfare arrangement and that:
(A) Is subject to ORS 750.301 to 750.341; or
(B) Is fully insured  and otherwise exempt under ORS 750.303 (4) but elects to be governed by
ORS 743B.010 to 743B.013; or
(e) Any other person or corporation responsible for the payment of benefits or provision of ser-
vices.
Enrolled House Bill 2046 (HB 2046-A) Page 4
(6) “Dependent” means the spouse or child of an eligible employee, subject  to applicable terms
of the health benefit plan covering the employee.
(7) “Eligible employee”  means an employee who is eligible for coverage under a group health
benefit plan.
(8) “Employee” means any individual employed by an employer.
(9) “Enrollee” means an employee, dependent of the  employee or an individual otherwise eligible
for a group or individual health benefit plan  who has enrolled for coverage under the terms of the
plan.
(10) “Exchange” means [ an American Health Benefit Exchange described in 42 U.S.C. 18031,
18032, 18033 and 18041] the health insurance exchange as defined in ORS 741.300 .
(11) “Exclusion period”  means a period during which specified treatments or services are ex-
cluded from coverage.
(12) “Financial impairment” means that a carrier is not insolvent and is:
(a) Considered by the director to be potentially unable to fulfill its contractual obligations; or
(b) Placed under  an order of rehabilitation or conservation by a court of competent jurisdiction.
(13)(a) “Geographic average rate” means the arithmetical average of the lowest premium and the
corresponding highest premium to be charged by a carrier in a geographic  area established by the
director for the carrier’s:
(A) Group health benefit plans offered to small employers; or
(B) Individual health benefit plans.
(b) “Geographic average rate” does not include premium differences that are due to  differences
in benefit design, age, tobacco use or family composition.
(14) “Grandfathered health plan” has the meaning  prescribed by rule by the United States Sec-
retaries of Labor, Health and Human Services and the Treasury  pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 18011(e) that
is in effect on January 1, 2017.
(15) “Group eligibility waiting period” means,  with respect to a group health benefit plan, the
period of employment or membership with the group that a prospective enrollee must  complete be-
fore plan coverage begins.
(16)(a) “Health benefit plan” means any:
(A) Hospital expense, medical expense or hospital or medical expense policy or certificate;
(B) Subscriber contract of a health care service contractor as defined in ORS 750.005; or
(C) Plan provided by a multiple employer welfare arrangement or by  another benefit arrange-
ment defined in the  federal Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended, to the
extent that the plan is subject to state regulation.
(b) “Health benefit plan” does not include:
(A) Coverage for accident only, specific disease or condition only, credit or disability income;
(B) Coverage of Medicare services pursuant to contracts with the federal government;
(C) Medicare supplement insurance policies;
(D) Coverage of TRICARE services pursuant to contracts with the federal government;
(E) Benefits delivered through a flexible spending arrangement established  pursuant to section
125 of the Internal Revenue Code  of 1986, as amended, when the benefits are provided in addition
to a group health benefit plan;
(F) Separately offered long term care insurance, including, but not limited to, coverage of nurs-
ing home care, home health care and community-based care;
(G) Independent, noncoordinated, hospital-only indemnity insurance or other fixed  indemnity in-
surance;
(H) Short term health insurance policies [ that are in effect for periods of three months or less,
including the term of a renewal of the policy ];
(I) Dental only coverage;
(J) Vision only coverage;
(K) Stop-loss coverage that meets the requirements of ORS 742.065;
(L) Coverage issued as a supplement to liability insurance;
Enrolled House Bill 2046 (HB 2046-A) Page 5
(M) Insurance arising out of a workers’ compensation or similar law;
(N) Automobile medical  payment insurance or insurance under which benefits are payable with
or without regard to fault and that is  statutorily required to be contained in any liability insurance
policy or equivalent self-insurance; or
(O) Any employee welfare benefit plan that  is exempt from state regulation because of the fed-
eral Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended.
[(c) For purposes of this  subsection, renewal of a short term health insurance policy includes the
issuance of a new short term health insurance policy by  an insurer to a policyholder within 60 days
after the expiration of a policy previously issued by the insurer to the policyholder. ]
(17) “Individual health benefit plan” means a health benefit plan:
(a) That is issued to an individual policyholder; or
(b) That provides individual coverage through a trust, association  or similar group, regardless
of the situs of the policy or contract.
(18) “Initial enrollment period” means a period of at least 30 days  following commencement of
the first eligibility period for an individual.
(19) “Late enrollee” means  an individual who enrolls in a group health benefit plan subsequent
to the initial enrollment period during which the individual was  eligible for coverage but declined
to enroll. However, an eligible individual shall not be considered a late enrollee if:
(a) The  individual qualifies for a special enrollment period in accordance with 42 U.S.C. 300gg
or as prescribed by rule by the Department of Consumer and Business Services;
(b) The individual applies for coverage during an open enrollment period;
(c) A court issues an order that coverage be provided for a  spouse or minor child under an
employee’s employer sponsored health benefit plan and request for  enrollment is made within 30
days after issuance of the court order;
(d) The individual is employed by an employer that offers  multiple health benefit plans and the
individual elects a different health benefit plan during an open enrollment period; or
(e) The individual’s coverage under Medicaid, Medicare, TRICARE, Indian Health Service  or a
publicly sponsored or subsidized health plan,  including, but not limited to, the medical assistance
program under ORS chapter 414, has been involuntarily terminated  within 63 days after applying for
coverage in a group health benefit plan.
(20) “Multiple  employer welfare arrangement” means a multiple employer welfare arrangement
as defined in section 3 of the  federal Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended,
29 U.S.C. 1002, that is subject to ORS 750.301 to 750.341.
(21) “Preexisting condition exclusion” means:
(a) Except for a grandfathered health plan, a limitation  or exclusion of benefits or a denial of
coverage based on a medical condition being  present before the effective date of coverage or before
the date coverage is denied, whether or not any medical advice, diagnosis, care  or treatment was
recommended or received for the condition before the date of coverage or denial of coverage.
(b) With respect to a grandfathered health plan, a  provision applicable to an enrollee or late
enrollee that excludes coverage for services,  charges or expenses incurred during a specified period
immediately following enrollment for a condition for which  medical advice, diagnosis, care or
treatment was recommended or  received during a specified period immediately preceding enrollment.
For purposes of this paragraph pregnancy and  genetic information do not constitute preexisting
conditions.
(22) “Premium” includes insurance  premiums or other fees charged for a health benefit plan,
including the costs of benefits paid or reimbursements made to or  on behalf of enrollees covered by
the plan.
(23) “Rating period” means the 12-month calendar period for which premium rates established
by a carrier are in effect, as determined by the carrier.
(24) “Representative” does not include an insurance producer or an  employee or authorized
representative of an insurance producer or carrier.
Enrolled House Bill 2046 (HB 2046-A) Page 6
(25)(a) “Short term  health insurance policy” means a policy of health insurance that is
in effect for a period of three months or less, including the term of a renewal of the policy.
(b) As used in  this subsection, “term of a renewal” includes the term of a new short term
health insurance policy issued by an insurer to a policyholder no later than 60 days after the
expiration of a short term health insurance policy issued by the insurer to the policyholder.
[(25)] (26)  “Small employer” means an employer who employed an average of at least one  but
not more than 50 full-time equivalent employees on business days during the preceding calendar year
and who employs at least one full-time equivalent employee on the first day of  the plan year, de-
termined in accordance with a methodology prescribed by the Department of Consumer and Business
Services by rule.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 743B.250 is amended to read:
743B.250. All insurers offering a health benefit plan in this state shall:
(1) Provide to all enrollees directly or in the case of a group policy to  the employer or other
policyholder for distribution to enrollees, to all applicants, and to prospective applicants  upon re-
quest, the following information:
(a) The insurer’s written policy on the rights of enrollees, including the right:
(A) To participate in decision making regarding the enrollee’s health care.
(B) To be treated with respect and  with recognition of the enrollee’s dignity and need for pri-
vacy.
(C) To have grievances handled in accordance with this section.
(D) To be provided with the information described in this section.
(b) An explanation of the procedures described in subsection (2) of this section  for making cov-
erage determinations and resolving grievances. The  explanation must be culturally and linguistically
appropriate, as prescribed by the Department  of Consumer and  Business Services  by rule, and
must include:
(A) The procedures for requesting an  expedited response to an internal appeal under subsection
(2)(d) of this section or for requesting an  expedited external review of an adverse benefit determi-
nation;
(B) A statement that if an insurer does not comply with  the decision of an independent review
organization under ORS 743B.256, the enrollee may sue the insurer under ORS 743B.258;
(C) The procedure to obtain assistance available from the  insurer, if any, and from the Depart-
ment of Consumer and Business Services in filing grievances; and
(D) A description of the process for filing a complaint with the department.
(c) A summary of benefits and an explanation of coverage in a form  and manner prescribed by
the department by rule.
(d) A summary of the insurer’s policies on prescription drugs, including:
(A) Cost-sharing differentials;
(B) Restrictions on coverage;
(C) Prescription drug formularies;
(D) Procedures by which a provider  with prescribing authority may prescribe clinically appro-
priate drugs not included on the formulary;
(E) Procedures for the coverage of clinically appropriate prescription  drugs not included on the
formulary; and
(F) A summary of the criteria for determining whether  a drug is experimental or investigational.
(e) A list  of network providers and how the enrollee can obtain current information about the
availability of providers and how to  access and schedule services with providers, including clinic
and hospital networks. The list must be available online and upon request in printed format.
(f) Notice of the enrollee’s right to select a primary care provider and specialty  care providers.
(g) How to obtain referrals for specialty care in accordance with ORS 743B.227.
(h) Restrictions on services obtained outside of the insurer’s network or service area.
(i) The availability of continuity of care as required by ORS 743B.225.
Enrolled House Bill 2046 (HB 2046-A) Page 7
(j) Procedures for accessing after-hours care and emergency services as required by ORS
743A.012.
(k) Cost-sharing requirements and other charges to enrollees.
(L) Procedures, if any, for changing providers.
(m) Procedures, if any, by which enrollees  may participate in the development of the insurer’s
corporate  policies.
(n) A summary of how the  insurer makes decisions regarding coverage and payment for treat-
ment or services, including a general description of any  prior authorization and utilization review
requirements that affect coverage or payment.
(o) Disclosure of any risk-sharing arrangement the insurer has with physicians  or other provid-
ers.
(p) A summary of the insurer’s procedures for protecting the  confidentiality of medical records
and other enrollee information and the requirement under ORS 743B.555 that a carrier or  third
party administrator  send communications containing protected health information only to the
enrollee who is the subject of the protected health information.
(q) An explanation of assistance provided to non-English-speaking enrollees.
(r) Notice of the information available from the department that is  filed by insurers as required
under ORS 743B.200, 743B.202 and 743B.423.
(2) Establish procedures, in accordance with requirements  adopted by the department, for mak-
ing coverage determinations and resolving grievances that provide for all of the following:
(a) Timely notice of adverse benefit determinations.
(b) A method for recording all grievances, including the nature of the grievance  and significant
action  taken.
(c) Written decisions.
(d) An expedited response to a request for  an internal appeal that accommodates the clinical
urgency of the situation.
(e) At least one but  not more than two levels of internal appeal for group health benefit plans
and one level of internal appeal for individual health benefit plans and for any denial  of an excep-
tion to a prescription drug formulary. If an insurer provides:
(A) Two levels of internal appeal, a person who was involved in the consideration of the  initial
denial or the first level of  internal appeal may not be involved in the second level of internal appeal;
and
(B) No more than one level of internal appeal, a  person who was involved in the consideration
of the initial denial may not be involved in the internal appeal.
(f)(A) An external  review that meets the requirements of ORS 743B.252, 743B.254 and 743B.255,
after the enrollee has exhausted internal appeals or after  the enrollee has been deemed to have
exhausted internal appeals.
(B) An enrollee shall be deemed to have exhausted internal appeals if an insurer fails  to strictly
comply with this section and federal requirements for internal appeals.
(g) The opportunity for the enrollee to  receive continued coverage of an approved and ongoing
course of treatment under the health benefit plan pending the conclusion of the internal  appeal
process.
(h) The opportunity for the enrollee or any  authorized representative chosen by the enrollee to:
(A) Submit for consideration by  the insurer any written comments, documents, records and other
materials relating to the adverse benefit determination; and
(B) Receive from the insurer, upon request and  free of charge, reasonable access to and copies
of all documents, records and other information relevant to the adverse benefit determination.
(3) Establish procedures for notifying affected enrollees of:
(a) A change in or termination of any benefit; and
(b)(A) The termination of a primary care delivery office or site; and
(B) Assistance available to enrollees in selecting a new primary care delivery office or site.
Enrolled House Bill 2046 (HB 2046-A) Page 8
(4) Provide the information  described in subsection (2) of this section and ORS 743B.254 at each
level of internal appeal to an enrollee who  is notified of an adverse benefit determination or to an
enrollee who files a grievance.
(5) Upon the request of an enrollee, applicant or prospective applicant, provide:
(a) The insurer’s annual report on grievances and internal appeals submitted to the  department
under subsection (8) of this section.
(b) A description  of the insurer’s efforts, if any, to monitor and improve the quality of health
services.
(c) Information about the insurer’s procedures for credentialing network providers.
(6) Provide, upon the request of an enrollee, a written summary of information that  the insurer
may consider in its utilization review of a particular condition or disease, to the extent  the insurer
maintains such criteria. Nothing in  this subsection requires an insurer to advise an enrollee how the
insurer would cover or treat  that particular enrollee’s disease or condition. Utilization review cri-
teria that are proprietary shall be subject to oral disclosure only.
(7) Maintain for a period of at least six years written records  that document all grievances de-
scribed  in  ORS 743B.001 (7)(a) and make the written records available for examination by the de-
partment or by an enrollee or authorized representative  of an enrollee with respect to a grievance
made by the enrollee. The written records must include but are not limited to the following:
(a) Notices and claims associated with each grievance.
(b) A general description of the reason for the grievance.
(c) The date the grievance was received by the insurer.
(d) The date of the internal appeal or the date of any internal appeal  meeting held concerning
the appeal.
(e) The result of the internal appeal at each level of appeal.
(f) The name of the covered person for whom the grievance was submitted.
(8) Provide an annual summary to the department of the  insurer’s aggregate data regarding
grievances, internal appeals and requests for external review in  a format prescribed by the depart-
ment to ensure consistent reporting on the number, nature and disposition of grievances,  internal
appeals and requests for external review.
(9) Allow the exercise of any rights described in  this section  or ORS 743B.252 or 743B.255  by
an authorized representative.
(10) Procedures adopted under subsection (2) of this section for health benefit plans other
than grandfathered health plans must be consistent with 42 U.S.C. 300-gg-19  and rules
adopted by the United States Department of Health  and Human Services implementing 42
U.S.C. 300-gg-19.
(11) An adverse benefit determination under subsection (2)(a) of this section that  is pro-
vided to an enrollee in a health benefit plan other than a grandfathered health plan must:
(a) Be provided in a culturally and linguistic appropriate manner;
(b) Be consistent with federal requirements regarding the manner and content for  no-
tices of benefit determinations and federal requirements for the full and fair review  of ad-
verse benefit determinations; and
(c) Include the information required by subsection (4) of this section and:
(A) Information sufficient  to identify the claim involved, the date of services, the health
care provider and, if applicable, the claim amount;
(B) A  statement describing the availability, upon request, of the information described
in subsection (12) of this section;
(C) The specific reason for the adverse benefit determination, a reference to the  specific
plan provisions on which the determination is based, the denial code and the  meaning of the
denial code and a description of the  standard that was used to make the determination, if
any;
(D) A description of available internal appeals  and external reviews, including expedited
appeals and reviews, and instructions on how to initiate an appeal or review; and
Enrolled House Bill 2046 (HB 2046-A) Page 9
(E) Contact information for the office of consumer assistance  within the Department of
Consumer and Business Services.
(12) Upon the request of an enrollee, an insurer  that makes an adverse benefit determi-
nation with respect  to the enrollee under a health benefit plan other than a grandfathered
health plan must provide the enrollee with the diagnosis  code, the meaning of the diagnosis
code, the treatment code and the  meaning of the treatment code that are associated with
the adverse benefit determination.
(13) An adverse benefit determination  issued to an enrollee following the final level of
internal appeals by an insurer  under a health benefit plan other than a grandfathered health
plan must, in addition to the requirements under subsection (11) of this section, include:
(a) An  explanation and discussion of the decision to uphold the initial adverse benefit
determination; and
(b) An authorization form, or other document that complies with  state and federal pri-
vacy laws and is approved by the department, with which an enrollee that  requests an ex-
ternal review under ORS 743B.255 may authorize the insurer and  the enrollee’s treating
health care provider to disclose medical records or  other protected health information per-
tinent to the external review.
SECTION 8.  ORS 743B.252 is amended to read:
743B.252. (1) An insurer  offering health benefit plans in this state shall have an external review
program that meets the requirements of this section and ORS 743B.255 and rules  adopted by the
Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services to carry out the  provisions of this
section and ORS 743B.250 and 743B.255. Each insurer shall provide the external review through an
independent review organization that is under contract with  the director to provide external review.
Each health benefit plan  must allow an enrollee, by applying to the insurer or the director, to obtain
review by an independent review organization of a dispute relating to  an adverse benefit determi-
nation by the insurer on one or more of the following:
(a) Whether a course or plan of treatment is medically necessary.
(b) Whether a course or plan of treatment is experimental or investigational.
(c) Whether a course or plan of treatment that an enrollee is undergoing is an active  course of
treatment for purposes of continuity of care under ORS 743B.225.
(d) Whether a course or plan of treatment is delivered in an appropriate health care setting  and
with the appropriate level of care.
(e) Whether an exception to the health benefit plan’s  prescription drug formulary should be
granted.
(2) An insurer shall incur  all costs of its external review program. The insurer may not establish
or charge a fee payable by enrollees for conducting external review.
(3)(a) When an enrollee applies for external review, the director  shall appoint an independent
review organization. When an independent review organization is appointed, the insurer  shall for-
ward all medical records and other relevant materials to the  independent review organization no
later than five business days after  the appointment. The insurer shall produce additional information
as requested  by the independent review organization to the extent that the information is reasonably
available to the insurer. An independent  review organization may reverse the adverse benefit de-
termination if the insurer fails to furnish records,  information and materials to the independent re-
view organization in a timely manner.
(b) Paragraph (a) of this subsection does not require an insurer  to disclose protected
health information to an independent  review organization if the disclosure is prohibited by
state or federal law.
(4) An enrollee may submit additional information to the independent review organization  no
later than five business days after the enrollee’s  receipt of notification of the appointment of the
independent review organization and the organization must consider the information in its review.
(5) The insurer and the director shall expedite the external review:
Enrolled House Bill 2046 (HB 2046-A) Page 10
(a) If the adverse benefit determination concerns  an admission, the availability of care, a con-
tinued stay or a health  care service for a medical condition for which the enrollee received emer-
gency services, as defined in ORS 743A.012, and has not been discharged from a  health care facility;
or
(b) If a provider with an established  clinical relationship to the enrollee certifies in writing and
provides  supporting  documentation that the ordinary time period for external review would seriously
jeopardize the life or health of the enrollee or the enrollee’s ability to regain maximum function.
SECTION 9.  ORS 743B.254 is amended to read:
743B.254. An insurer  [ of] offering a health benefit plan shall include in the plan the following
statements, in boldfaced type or otherwise emphasized:
(1) A statement  of the right of [ enrollees ] an enrollee  to apply for external review by an inde-
pendent review organization;
(2) A statement that an enrollee applying for external  review by an independent review
organization may be required to authorize the release of any medical records necessary  to
conduct the external review;  and
[(2)] (3) A statement that if the insurer does not follow a decision of an independent review or-
ganization, the enrollee has the right to sue the insurer.
SECTION 10.  ORS 743B.255 is amended to read:
743B.255. (1) An  enrollee shall apply in writing for external review of an adverse benefit deter-
mination by the insurer of a health benefit plan not later than the 180th day after  receipt of the
insurer’s final written decision following its grievance and internal appeal process  under ORS
743B.250.
(2) An enrollee  is eligible for external review only if the enrollee has [ satisfied the following
requirements:]
[(a) The  enrollee must have signed a waiver granting the independent review organization access
to the medical records of the enrollee. ]
[(b) The enrollee  must have] exhausted the plan’s internal appeal procedures established pursuant
to ORS 743B.250 or be deemed to  have exhausted the plan’s internal appeal procedures. The insurer
may waive the requirement of  compliance with the internal appeal procedures and have a dispute
referred directly to external review upon the enrollee’s  consent. An enrollee is deemed to have ex-
hausted the internal appeal procedures if the insurer fails to strictly comply with ORS 743B.250 and
federal requirements for internal appeals.
[(2)] (3)  An enrollee who applies for external  review of an adverse benefit determination shall
provide complete and accurate information  to the independent review organization as provided in
ORS 743B.252.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 743B.323 is amended to read:
743B.323. (1) Before a  health insurer selling an individual policy or group health benefit plan[ ,
as defined in ORS 743B.005, ] may cancel a policy for nonpayment of premium, the insurer must  mail
a separate notice to the policyholder [ at least 10 days prior  to the end of the grace period ] informing
the policyholder that the premium  was not received and that the policy will be terminated as of the
premium due date if the premium is not received by  the end of the applicable grace period required
by ORS 743.417 and 743B.320.
(2) The notice  described in subsection (1) of this section  shall  be in writing and mailed by
first class mail to the last-known address of the policyholder[ .] at least:
(a) Ten days prior to the end of the grace period specified in ORS 743.417  (1)(a) and
743B.320; or
(b) Fifteen days prior to the end of the grace period specified in ORS 743.417 (1)(b).
(3) The Department of Consumer and  Business Services may prescribe by rule the in-
formation that must be contained in the notice required by subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 743B.422 is amended to read:
743B.422. All utilization review performed pursuant to  a medical services contract to which an
insurer is not a party shall comply with the following:
Enrolled House Bill 2046 (HB 2046-A) Page 11
(1) The criteria used in the  review process and the method of development of the criteria shall
be made available for review to a party to such medical services contract upon request.
(2) A physician licensed under ORS 677.100 to  677.228 shall be responsible for all final recom-
mendations regarding the necessity or appropriateness of services or the site at which  the services
are provided  and shall consult as appropriate with medical and mental health specialists in making
such recommendations.
(3) Any patient or provider who  has had a request for treatment or payment for services denied
as not medically necessary or as experimental shall be provided an opportunity for  a timely appeal
before an appropriate medical consultant or peer review committee.
(4) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, a determination on a provider’s  or an
enrollee’s request for prior authorization of a nonemergency service  must be issued within a rea-
sonable period of time appropriate to the medical circumstances but  no later than two business days
after receipt of the request, and qualified health  care personnel must be available for same-day
telephone responses to inquiries concerning certification of continued length of stay.
(5) If additional information from an  enrollee or a provider is necessary to make a determination
on a  request for prior authorization, no later than two business days after receipt of the request,
the enrollee and the provider  shall be notified in writing of the specific additional information
needed to make the determination. The determination must be issued by the later of:
(a) Two business days after receipt of a response to the request for additional information; or
(b) Fifteen days after the date of the request  for additional information  unless otherwise pro-
vided by federal law.
Passed by House April 27, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 1, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2046 (HB 2046-A) Page 12